North Carolina statutes. Chapter 7B. Juvenile Code.
Article 7. Discovery.

§ 7B-700.
Sharing of information; discovery.

Sharing of Information. — A department of social services is authorized to share with any other party information relevant to the subject matter of an action pending under this Subchapter. However, this subsection does not authorize the disclosure of the identity of the reporter or any uniquely identifying information that would lead to the discovery of the reporter’s identity in accordance with

G.S. 7B-302

or the identity of any other person where the agency making the information available determines that the disclosure would be likely to endanger the life or safety of the person.

Local Rules. — The chief district court judge may adopt local rules or enter an administrative order addressing the sharing of information among parties and the use of discovery.

Discovery. — Any party may file a motion for discovery. The motion shall contain a specific description of the information sought and a statement that the requesting party has made a reasonable effort to obtain the information pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section or that the information cannot be obtained pursuant to subsections (a) and (b) of this section. The motion shall be served upon all parties pursuant to

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 5. The motion shall be heard and ruled upon within 10 business days of the filing of the motion. The court may grant, restrict, defer, or deny the relief requested. Any order shall avoid unnecessary delay of the hearing, establish expedited deadlines for completion, and conform to

G.S. 7B-803

.

Protective Order. — Any party served with a motion for discovery may request that the discovery be denied, restricted, or deferred and shall submit, for in camera inspection, the document, information, or materials the party seeks to protect. If the court enters any order granting relief, copies of the documents, information, or materials submitted in camera shall be preserved for appellate review in the event of an appeal.

Redisclosure. — Information obtained through discovery or sharing of information under this section may not be redisclosed if the redisclosure is prohibited by State or federal law.

Guardian Ad Litem. — Unless provided otherwise by local rules, information or reports obtained by the guardian ad litem pursuant to

G.S. 7B-601

are not subject to disclosure pursuant to this subsection, except that reports and records shall be shared with all parties before submission to the court.

History.

1979, c. 815, s. 1; 1998-202, s. 6; 1999-456, s. 60; 2009-311, s. 4.